ko: 전자기기 > 비디오 > 비디오 부대용품: 3D 안경; 컴퓨터 모니터 부대용품; 프로젝터 부대용품; 리와인더; 텔레프롬프터; 텔레비전 부품/부대용품; 비디오 확대기
pl: Elektronika > Video > Akcesoria do wideo: Okulary 3D; Akcesoria do monitorów komputerowych; Akcesoria do projektorów; Przewijacze; Telepromptery; Akcesoria i części do telewizorów; Powiększacze wideo
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Vídeo > Acessórios vídeo: Óculos 3D; Acessórios de monitor de computador; Acessórios de projetor; Rebobinadores; Teleponto; Acessórios e peças de televisão; Ampliadores de vídeo
bg-BG: Електроника > Видео > Видео аксесоари: 3D очила; Аксесоари за компютърни монитори; Аксесоари за проектор; Устройства за пренавиване; Телепромптъри; Телевизионни части и аксесоари; Видео увеличители
tr: Elektronik > Video > Video Aksesuarları: 3B Gözlükler; Bilgisayar Monitörü Aksesuarları; Projeksiyon Cihazı Aksesuarları; Geri Sarma Makineleri; Teleprompterlar; Televizyon Parçaları ve Aksesuarları; Video Büyüteçleri
hr-HR: Elektronika > Video > Videopribor: 3D naočale; Pribor za računalne monitore; Pribor za projektore; Premotači; Teleprompteri; Dijelovi i dodaci za televizore; Videopovećala
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 視訊/影音 > 視訊配件: 3D 眼鏡; 電腦螢幕配件; 投影機配件; 迴帶機; 提詞器; 電視零件/配件; 影片放大器
fr: Appareil électronique > Vidéo > Accessoires vidéo: Lunettes 3D; Accessoires pour écrans d’ordinateur; Accessoires pour projecteurs; Appareils de rembobinage; Télésouffleurs; Accessoires et pièces pour téléviseurs; Loupes vidéo
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 视频 > 摄影摄像配件: 3D 眼镜; 计算机显示器配件; 投影仪配件; 倒带机; 提词器; 电视机零件/配件; 视频放大镜
it: Elettronica > Video > Accessori video: Occhiali 3D; Accessori monitor computer; Accessori per proiettori; Riavvolgitori; Teleprompter; Accessori e componenti per TV; Ingranditori video
ja: 電子機器 > ビデオ > 映像機器関連用品: 3D眼鏡; PCモニター関連用品; プロジェクター関連用品; リワインダー; テレプロンプター; テレビパーツ・関連用品; 拡大読書器
nl: Elektronica > Video > Videoaccessoires: 3D-brillen; Accessoires voor computerbeeldschermen; Accessoires voor projectoren; Terugspoelapparaten; Teleprompters; Televisieonderdelen en -accessoires; Videoloepen
hu: Elektronika > Videó > Videókiegészítők: 3D szemüvegek; Számítógépmonitor-kiegészítők; Projektorkiegészítők; Visszatekercselők; Súgógépek; Televízió-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Videónagyítók
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > วิดีโอ > อุปกรณ์วิดีโอ: แว่นตา 3D; อุปกรณ์จอภาพคอมพิวเตอร์; อุปกรณ์เครื่องฉายภาพ; เครื่องกรอกลับ; เครื่องพร้อมเตอร์; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์ทีวี; เครื่องขยายภาพวิดีโอ
cs: Elektronika > Video > Videopříslušenství: 3D brýle; Počítačové monitory – příslušenství; Projektory – příslušenství; Převíječe; Telepromptery; Díly a příslušenství k televizorům; Video lupy
es: Electrónica > Video > Accesorios de vídeo: Gafas 3D; Accesorios para monitores de computadora; Accesorios para proyectores; Rebobinadores; Teleprompters; Accesorios y piezas para televisores; Lupas de video
lt-LT: Elektronika > Vaizdo įranga > Vaizdo įrangos priedai: 3D akiniai; Kompiuterių monitorių priedai; Projektorių priedai; Pervyniojimo įrenginiai; Telesufleriai; Televizorių dalys ir priedai; Vaizdo didinamieji stiklai
sl-SI: Elektronika > Video > Video dodatki: 3D očala; Dodatki za računalniške zaslone; Dodatki za projektorje; Naprave za previjanje; Teleprompterji; Deli in dodatki za televizorje; Video povečevalniki
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Βίντεο > Αξεσουάρ βίντεο: Γυαλιά 3D; Αξεσουάρ οθονών υπολογιστή; Αξεσουάρ προβολέων; Συσκευές ανάκτησης ταινιών; Συσκευές τηλεπαρουσίασης; Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ τηλεόρασης; Μεγεθυντές βίντεο
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Vídeo > Acessórios para vídeo: Óculos 3D; Acessórios para monitor de computador; Acessórios para projetor; Rebobinadores; Teleprompters; Acessórios e peças para televisão; Ampliadores de vídeo
ro-RO: Electronice > Video > Accesorii video: Ochelari 3D; Accesorii pentru monitoare calculator; Accesorii proiectoare; Dispozitive de derulat; Telepromptere; Piese și accesorii pentru televizoare; Lupe video
sk-SK: Elektronika > Video zariadenia > Video príslušenstvo: 3D okuliare; Príslušenstvo k počítačovým monitorom; Príslušenstvo k projektorom; Prevíjače; Telepromptery; TV diely a príslušenstvo; Videozvečšovače
fi: Elektroniikka > Video > Videotarvikkeet: 3D-lasit; Tietokonemonitorien lisätarvikkeet; Projektorin lisätarvikkeet; Videokasetin kelauslaite; Tekstiprompterilaite; Television osat ja tarvikkeet; Videosuurennin
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Video > Phụ kiện hình ảnh: Kính 3D; Phụ kiện màn hình máy tính; Phụ kiện máy chiếu; Máy cuộn lại băng video; Máy nhắc từng từ; Phụ tùng và phụ kiện tivi; Kính phóng đại video
ru: Электроника > Видеоаппаратура > Аксессуары для видеоаппаратуры: 3D-очки; Аксессуары для компьютерных мониторов; Аксессуары для проекторов; Устройства перемотки; Телесуфлеры; Детали и аксессуары для телевизоров; Видеоувеличители
da: Elektronik > Video > Video – tilbehør: 3D-briller; Computerskærm – tilbehør; Projektor – tilbehør; Tilbagespolere; Telepromptere; TV – reservedele og tilbehør; Video-forstørrelsesglas
de: Elektronik > Video > Videozubehör: 3D-Brillen; Computerbildschirmzubehör; Projektorzubehör; Spulgeräte; Teleprompter; TV-Zubehör; Videovergrößerungsgeräte
en: Electronics > Video > Video Accessories: 3D Glasses; Computer Monitor Accessories; Projector Accessories; Rewinders; Teleprompters; Television Parts & Accessories; Video Magnifiers
nb: Elektronikk > Video > Videotilbehør: 3D-briller; Tilbehør til dataskjermer; Projektortilbehør; Tilbakespolere; Telepromptere; TV-deler og -tilbehør; Videoforstørrelsesenheter
sv: Elektronik > Video > Videotillbehör: 3D-glasögon; Tillbehör till datorskärmar; Projektortillbehör; Tillbakaspolare; Telepromptrar; Tv-tillbehör; Videoförstorare